Vermont, session 2025-2026, H289.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Clean Energy Standard * * *
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 202b is amended to read:
§ 202b. STATE COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY PLAN
(a) The Department of Public Service, in conjunction with other State
agencies designated by the Governor, shall prepare a State Comprehensive
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 2 of 39
Energy Plan covering at least a 20-year period. The Plan shall seek to
implement the State energy policy set forth in section 202a of this title,
including meeting the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reductions
requirements goals pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 578, and shall be consistent with
the relevant goals of 24 V.S.A. § 4302 and with the Vermont Climate Action
Plan adopted and updated pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 592. The State
Comprehensive Energy Plan shall include:
* * *
(e) The Commissioner of Public Service (Commissioner) shall file an
annual report on progress in meeting the goals of the Plan. The report shall
address each of the following sectors of energy consumption in the State:
electricity, nonelectric fuels for thermal purposes, and transportation. In
preparing the report, the Commissioner shall consult with the Secretaries of
Administration, of Agriculture, Food and Markets, of Natural Resources, and
of Transportation and the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.
* * *
(3) For each sector, the report shall provide:
(A) In millions of British thermal units (MMBTUs) for the most
recent calendar year for which data are available, the total amount of energy
consumed, the amount of clean and renewable energy consumed, and the
percentage of clean and renewable energy consumed. For the electricity
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 3 of 39
sector, the report shall also state the amounts in megawatt hours (MWH) of
retail sales and load for Vermont as well as for each retail electricity provider
and the Vermont and New England summer and winter peak electric demand,
including the hour and day of peak demand.
(B) Projections of the energy reductions and shift to clean and
renewable energy expected to occur under existing policies, technologies, and
markets. The most recent available data shall be used to inform these
projections and shall be provided as a supplement to the data described in
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3).
* * *
(7) The report shall include the following information on progress
toward meeting the Renewable Clean Energy Standard (RES CES):
(A) An assessment of the costs and benefits of the RES CES based
on the most current available data, including rate and economic impacts,
customer savings, technology deployment, greenhouse gas emission reductions
achieved both relative to 10 V.S.A § 578 requirements and societally, fuel
price stability, effect on transmission and distribution upgrade costs, and any
recommended changes based on this assessment.
(i) For the most recent calendar year for which data is available,
each retail electricity provider’s retail sales and load, in MWh; required
amounts of clean and renewable energy for each category of the RES CES as
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 4 of 39
set forth in section 8005 of this title; and amounts of clean and renewable
energy and tradeable clean and renewable energy credits eligible to satisfy the
requirements of sections 8004 and 8005 of this title actually owned by the
Vermont retail electricity providers, expressed as a percentage of retail sales
and total load MWh purchases made by Vermont retail electricity providers to
meet demand.
* * *
(iv) The report shall assess how costs and benefits of the RES
CES are being distributed across State, to the extent possible given available
data, by retail electricity service territory, municipality, and environmental
justice focus populations, as defined by 3 V.S.A. § 6002. Such an assessment
shall consider metrics to monitor affordability of electric rates.
(B) Projections, looking at least 10 years ahead, of the impacts of the
RES CES.
* * *
(iii) The Department shall project, for the State, the impact of the
RES CES in each of the following areas: electric utility rates, total energy
consumption, electric energy consumption, fossil fuel consumption, and
greenhouse gas emissions. The report shall compare the amount or level in
each of these areas with and without the program.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 5 of 39
(C) An assessment of whether the requirements of the RES CES have
been met to date, and any recommended changes needed to achieve those
requirements.
(D) A summary of the activities of distributed renewable generation
programs that support the achievement of the RES CES, including:
* * *
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 8002 is amended to read:
§ 8002. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(7) “Environmental attributes” means the characteristics of a plant that
enable the energy it produces to qualify as clean or renewable energy and
include any and all benefits of the plant to the environment such as avoided
emissions or other impacts to air, water, or soil that may occur through the
plant’s displacement of a nonclean or nonrenewable energy source.
* * *
(25) “Clean energy” means both renewable energy, as defined in this
section, as well as electricity produced using a technology that does not emit
greenhouse gases as a by-product of energy generation.
* * *
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 6 of 39
(29) “RES” “CES” means the Renewable Clean Energy Standard
established under sections 8004 and 8005 of this title.
* * *
(33) “Tradeable zero emissions credits” or “ZECs” means all of the
environmental attributes associated with a single unit of energy generated by a
clean energy source where:
(A) those attributes are transferred or recorded separately from that
unit of energy;
(B) the party claiming ownership of the tradeable zero emissions
credits has acquired the exclusive legal ownership of all, and not less than all,
the environmental attributes associated with that unit of energy; and
(C) exclusive legal ownership can be verified through an auditable
contract path or pursuant to the system established or authorized by the
Commission or any program for tracking and verification of the ownership of
environmental attributes of energy legally recognized in any state and
approved by the Commission.
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 8004 is amended to read:
§ 8004. SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY; RENEWABLE CLEAN
ENERGY STANDARD (RES CES)
(a) Establishment Expansion; requirements. The RES Renewable Energy
Standard is established expanded to become the CES. Under this program, a
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 7 of 39
retail electricity provider shall not sell or otherwise provide or offer to sell or
provide electricity in the State of Vermont without ownership of sufficient
energy produced by clean and renewable energy plants or sufficient tradeable
renewable energy and zero emissions credits from plants whose energy is
capable of delivery in New England that reflect the required amounts of clean
and renewable energy set forth in section 8005 of this title or without support
of energy transformation projects in accordance with that section. A retail
electricity provider may meet the required amounts of clean and renewable
energy through eligible tradeable renewable energy and zero emissions credits
that it owns and retires, eligible clean and renewable energy resources with
environmental attributes still attached, or a combination of those credits and
resources.
(b) Rules. The Commission shall adopt update the rules that are necessary
to allow the Commission and the Department to implement and supervise
further the implementation and maintenance of the RES CES.
(c) RECS RECs and ZECs; banking. The Commission shall allow a
provider that has met the required amount amounts of renewable energy or
zero emissions credits in a given year, commencing with 2017, to retain
tradeable renewable energy or zero emissions credits created or purchased in
excess of that amount for application to the provider’s required amount of
clean or renewable energy in one of the following three years.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 8 of 39
(d) Alternative compliance payment. In lieu of purchasing renewable
energy or tradeable renewable energy or zero emissions credits or supporting
energy transformation projects to satisfy the requirements of this section and
section 8005 of this title, a retail electricity provider in this State may pay to
the Vermont Clean Energy Development Fund established under section 8015
of this title an alternative compliance payment at the applicable rate set forth in
section 8005. The administrator of the Vermont Clean Energy Development
Fund shall use the payment from a retail electricity provider electing to make
an alternative compliance payment to satisfy its obligations under subdivisions
8005(a)(1), 8005(a)(2), 8005(a)(4), and 8005(a)(5) of this title for the
development of renewable energy plants that are intended to serve and benefit
customers with low income of the retail electricity provider that has made the
payment. Such plants shall be located within the provider’s service territory, if
feasible. In the event that such a payment is insufficient to enable the
development of a renewable energy plant, the administrator may use the
payment for other initiatives allowed under section 8015 of this title that will
benefit customers with low income of the retail electricity provider that has
made the payment. As used in this subsection (d), “customer with low
income” means a person purchasing energy from a retail electricity provider
and with an income that is less than or equal to 80 percent of area median
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 9 of 39
income, adjusted for family size, as published annually by the U.S. Department
of Housing and Urban Development.
* * *
(f) Joint efforts. Retail electricity providers may engage in joint efforts to
meet one or more categories within the RES CES.
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 8005 is amended to read:
§ 8005. RES CES CATEGORIES
(a) Categories. This section specifies five categories of required resources
to meet the requirements of the RES CES established in section 8004 of this
title: total clean and renewable energy, distributed renewable generation,
energy transformation, new renewable energy, and load growth renewable
energy. In order to support progress toward Vermont’s climate goals and
requirements, a provider may, but shall not be required to, exceed the
statutorily required amounts under this section.
(1) Total clean and renewable energy.
(A) Purpose; establishment. To encourage the economic and
environmental benefits of renewable energy, this subdivision establishes, for
the RES CES, minimum total amounts of clean and renewable energy within
the supply portfolio of each retail electricity provider. To satisfy this
requirement, a provider may use clean energy generated within New England
or renewable energy with environmental attributes attached or any class of
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 10 of 39
tradeable renewable energy credits generated by any renewable energy plant
whose energy is capable of delivery in New England.
(B) Required amounts.
(i) The amounts of total clean and renewable energy required by
this subsection (a) shall be 63 percent of each retail electricity provider’s
annual load during the year beginning on January 1, 2025, increasing by at
least an additional four 7.4 percent each third January 1 thereafter until
reaching 100 percent: on and after January 1, 2030.
(i) on and after January 1, 2035 for a retail electricity provider who
serves a single customer that takes service at 115 kilovolts and each municipal
retail electricity provider formed under local charter or chapter 79 of this title;
and
(ii) on and after January 1, 2030, for all other retail electricity
providers The amount of total renewable energy required by this subsection (a)
shall be 55 percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual electricity
purchases during the year beginning on January 1, 2027, increasing by an
additional four percent each January 1 hereafter, until reaching 75 percent on
and after January 1, 2032.
* * *
(2) Distributed renewable generation.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 11 of 39
(A) Purpose; establishment. This subdivision establishes a
distributed renewable generation category for the RES CES. This category
encourages the use of distributed generation to support the reliability of the
State’s electric system;, reduce line losses;, contribute to avoiding or deferring
improvements to that system necessitated by transmission or distribution
constraints;, and diversify the size and type of resources connected to that
system. This category requires the use of renewable energy for these purposes
to reduce environmental and health impacts from air emissions that would
result from using other forms of generation.
* * *
(E) Avoiding transmission and distribution constraints.
(i) Procurements by retail electricity providers and programs that
support meeting the requirements of this subdivision (2) shall avoid
development of new facilities in generation constrained areas of the
distribution or transmission system that would not need to be expanded but for
the addition of additional generation, unless costs associated with development
in those generation constrained areas are not passed through to ratepayers
through the cost to utilities to purchase the generation or in any other manner.
To implement the intent of this section, the Commission may update or adopt
rules, including rules that require a locational adjustor fee.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 12 of 39
(ii) A retail electricity provider may petition the Commission for
relief of the requirements of subdivision (C) of this subdivision (a)(2) or the
associated alternative compliance payment, which may be granted if the
provider can demonstrate that it is unable to meet its requirements without
extensive upgrades to the transmission or distribution infrastructure that would
be borne by the provider’s ratepayers. If relief is granted, the retail electricity
provider shall be required to instead acquire new renewable generation from
facilities that qualify to meet the requirements of subdivision (4) of this
subsection (a), in addition to the requirements as described in subdivision (4)
of this subsection (a).
(3) Energy transformation.
(A) Purpose; establishment. This subdivision (3) establishes an
energy transformation category for the RES CES. This category encourages
Vermont retail electricity providers to support additional distributed renewable
generation or to support other projects to reduce fossil fuel consumed by their
customers and the emission of greenhouse gases attributable to that
consumption. A retail electricity provider may satisfy the energy
transformation requirement through distributed renewable generation in
addition to the generation used to satisfy subdivision (2) of this subsection (a)
or energy transformation projects or a combination of such generation and
projects.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 13 of 39
* * *
(4) New renewable energy.
(A) Purpose; establishment. This subdivision (4) establishes a new
regional renewable energy category for the RES CES. This category
encourages the use of new renewable generation to support the reliability of
the regional ISO-NE electric system. To satisfy this requirement, a provider
shall use new renewable energy with environmental attributes attached or any
class of tradeable renewable energy credits generated by any renewable energy
plant coming into service after January 1, 2010 whose energy is capable of
delivery in New England.
* * *
(6) Alternative compliance rates.
(A) The alternative compliance payment rates for the categories
established by subdivisions (1)–(3) of this subsection (a) shall be:
(i) total clean and renewable energy requirement — $0.01 per
kWh; and
(ii) distributed renewable generation and energy transformation
requirements — $0.06 per kWh.
(B) The Commission shall adjust these rates for inflation annually
commencing January 1, 2018, using the CPI.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 14 of 39
(C) For the distributed renewable energy, new renewable energy and
load growth requirements, it shall be $0.04 per kWh annually commencing on
January 1, 2025, with calculations for inflation beginning on January 1, 2023.
* * *
Sec. 5. 30 V.S.A. § 8006 is amended to read:
§ 8006. TRADEABLE CREDITS; ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES;
RECOGNITION, MONITORING, AND DISCLOSURE
(a) The Commission shall establish or adopt a amend and expand its system
of tradeable renewable energy credits for renewable resources that may be
earned by electric generation qualifying for the prior RES to include clean
energy generation. The system shall recognize tradeable renewable energy
credits monitored and traded on the New England Generation Information
System (GIS); shall provide a process for the recognition, approval, and
monitoring of environmental attributes attached to clean and renewable energy
that are eligible to satisfy the requirements of sections 8004 and 8005 of this
title but are not monitored and traded on the GIS; and shall otherwise be
consistent with regional practices.
(b) The Commission shall ensure that all electricity provider and provider-
affiliate disclosures and representations made with regard to a provider’s
portfolio are accurate and reasonably supported by objective data. Further, the
Commission shall ensure that providers disclose the types of generation used
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 15 of 39
and shall clearly distinguish between energy or tradeable energy credits
provided from clean, renewable, and nonrenewable energy sources and
existing and new renewable energy.
Sec. 6. 30 V.S.A. § 8008 is amended to read:
§ 8008. AGREEMENTS; ATTRIBUTE REVENUES; DISPOSITION BY
COMMISSION
(a) As used in this section, “the revenues” means revenues that are from the
sale, through tradeable clean or renewable energy certificates or other means,
of environmental attributes associated with the generation of clean and
renewable energy from a system of generation resources with a total plant
capacity greater than 200 MW and that are received by a Vermont retail
electricity provider on or after May 1, 2012, pursuant to an agreement,
contract, memorandum of understanding, or other transaction in which a
person or entity agrees to transfer such revenues or rights associated with such
attributes to the provider.
* * *
Sec. 7. 30 V.S.A. § 8005b is added to read:
§ 8005b. RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR COMMUNITIES PROGRAM
(a) Establishment. The Renewable Energy for Communities Program is
established. To achieve the goals of subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title, the
Commission shall develop the Renewable Energy for Communities Program
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 16 of 39
that meets the eligibility requirements of this section, which may be
implemented by rule, order, or contract. Retail electricity providers shall issue
periodic solicitations subject to the requirements of the Renewable Energy for
Communities Program.
(b) Eligible resources. Distributed renewable generation, as defined in
subdivision 8002(a)(2) of this title, shall be eligible to participate in this
program.
(c) Objectives. It shall be the objective of the Renewable Energy for
Communities Program to develop distributed generation at least-cost to
ratepayers that is directed by, developed in consultation with, or directly
benefits communities by one or more of the following:
(1) delivering benefits from renewable energy systems to customers who
have historically been marginalized or faced inequitable access to the benefits
of renewable energy, including environmental justice focus populations as
defined by 3 V.S.A. § 6002;
(2) supporting community participation in the development and
governance of distributed renewable generation;
(3) supporting the delivery of benefits to tenants of buildings that are
designated as affordable housing;
(4) supporting the delivery of benefits to school-and municipal-owned
buildings; and
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 17 of 39
(5) advancing other priority issues as identified during program
development as detailed under subsection (f) of this section.
(d) Capacity requirement. Retail electricity providers shall issue
solicitations for distributed renewable generation equivalent to a percentage of
their requirement under subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title, as determined by
the Commission.
(e) Solicitation requirement. On a schedule to be developed by the
Commission, each retail electricity provider with an obligation under
subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title shall issue solicitations for eligible
distributed generation until it has met its capacity requirement. Coordinated
solicitations shall be encouraged. Each retail electric provider shall review
proposed projects in its service territory according to a set of consistent core
criteria as approved by the Commission and consistent with the objectives set
forth in this section. The requirements for the retail electricity providers that
are already 100 percent renewable may be limited by the Commission to an
amount equal to the provider’s requirement to meet distributed generation with
load growth above the baseline year of 2024 and allowed on a less frequent
solicitation schedule.
(f) Program development. On or before January 1, 2027, the Commission
shall implement the Renewable Energy for Communities Program. In
developing the Program, the Commission shall:
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 18 of 39
(1) determine principles to guide the development of eligible distributed
generation and consider whether additional objectives for the Program as
defined under subsection (a) of this section are necessary;
(2) determine whether a percentage of each retail electricity provider’s
capacity requirement should be reserved to serve specific customers who have
previously experienced inequitable access to the benefits of renewable energy
and determine any minimum requirement for those projects procured under
this program for serving those specific customers;
(3) establish a set of consistent review criteria to be used by all retail
electricity providers in solicitations for eligible distributed generation
considering issues in addition to cost, such as community support or
engagement while developing the proposal; potential for local workforce
development and other community benefits to be delivered to the host
community; location of the project, including whether it is in a constrained
area of the distribution or transmission system or in an area identified as a
preferred location in a regional or municipal enhanced energy plan pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 4352; and anticipated generation profile;
(4) identify reporting requirements and necessary metrics to monitor
how benefits and burdens from the Program are distributed across ratepayers;
(5) consult with individuals representing a diverse array of perspectives,
including at minimum representation from industry, retail electric providers,
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 19 of 39
environmental advocates, State agencies, regional and local governments,
communities identified as environmental justice focus populations under 3
V.S.A. § 6002, municipalities experiencing high energy burden as identified by
Efficiency Vermont’s 2023 Energy Burden Report, renters, and multifamily
affordable housing representatives;
(6) determine a process for exempting or deferring retail electricity
provider requirements under this section in the event no proposals below the
applicable alternative compliance payment are received in response to a retail
electricity provider’s solicitation;
(7) determine a process for evaluating and reporting on the success of
the Program in achieving the stated goals; and
(8) consider other issues as identified throughout the process.
(g) The Commission may use its authority under sections 20 and 21 of this
title as may be necessary to support engagement and technical analysis
necessary to develop the Renewable Energy for Communities Program.
Funding may be used to support per diem compensation and reimbursement of
expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 to conduct engagement with
parties who are not otherwise compensated by their employer.
Sec. 8. THERMAL SECTOR PROGRAM FUNDS
(a) For the calendar years 2025 and 2026, up to $7,000,000.00 of the
revenues collected by the energy efficiency charge established 30 V.S.A.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 20 of 39
§ 209(d)(3)(B) shall be allocated by the Public Utility Commission to the Fuel
Efficiency Fund established under 30 V.S.A. § 203a. For the calendar years
2027, 2028, and 2029, $15,000,000.00 of the revenues collected by the energy
efficiency charge established 30 V.S.A. § 209(d)(3)(B) shall be allocated by
the Public Utility Commission to the Fuel Efficiency Fund established under
30 V.S.A. § 203a.
(b) Of the funds described in subsection (a) of this section, $900,000.00 per
year shall be allocated to the Agency of Natural Resources to fund the Energy
Navigators Program delivered through the Community Action Agencies and
$750,000.00 per year will be allocated to the Department for Children and
Families, Office of Economic Opportunity to support heat pump deployment
through the Weatherization Assistance Program.
(c) In allocating the remaining balance in the Fuel Efficiency Fund, the
Department of Public Service shall prioritize weatherization assistance for
customers with low and moderate income and consider issues such as current
and projected funding amounts and maintaining continuity in workforce
associated with delivering thermal sector programs.
(d) The total amount collected from the energy efficiency charge for the
calendar years 2027, 2028, and 2029 shall be no greater than the amount
authorized to be collected in 2026.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 21 of 39
* * * Electric Vehicle Incentives * * *
Sec. 9. 30 V.S.A. § 209(e) is amended to read:
(e) Thermal energy and process fuel efficiency funding.
(1) Each of the following shall be used to deliver thermal energy and
process fuel energy efficiency services in accordance with this section for
unregulated fuels to Vermont consumers of such fuels. In addition, the
Commission may authorize an entity appointed to deliver such services under
subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section to use monies subject to this subsection
for the engineering, design, and construction of facilities for the conversion of
thermal energy customers using fossil fuels to district heat if the majority of
the district’s energy is from biomass sources, the district’s distribution system
is highly energy efficient, and such conversion is cost effective.
* * *
(B) Net For calendar years 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029, net
revenues above costs from the sale of carbon credits under the cap and trade
program established under section 255 of this title, or $6,000,000.00,
whichever is lower, which shall be deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund
established by this section.
* * *
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 22 of 39
Sec. 10. 30 V.S.A. § 255(d) is amended to read:
(d) Appointment of consumer trustees. The Public Utility Commission, by
rule, order, or competitive solicitation, may appoint one or more consumer
trustees to receive, hold, bank, and sell tradable carbon credits created under
this program. Trustees may include Vermont electric distribution utilities, the
fiscal agent collecting and disbursing funds to support the statewide efficiency
utility, or a financial institution or other entity with the expertise and financial
resources to manage a portfolio of carbon credits for the long-term benefit of
Vermont energy consumers. The For the calendar years 2025, 2026, 2027,
2028, and 2029, the net proceeds above costs from the sale of carbon credits or
$6,000,000.00, whichever is lower, shall be deposited into the Electric
Efficiency Fund established under subdivision 209(d)(3) of this title. These
funds shall be used by the entity or entities appointed under subdivision
209(d)(2)(B) of this title to help meet the building efficiency goals established
under 10 V.S.A. § 581 by delivering heating and process-fuel energy
efficiency services to Vermont consumers who use such fuel. Any proceeds
above costs from the sale of carbon credits that exceed $6,000,000.00 shall be
allocated to the Agency of Transportation for the Incentive Program for New
Plug-in Electric Vehicles, MileageSmart, and Replace Your Ride Program, as
defined in 19 V.S.A. § 2902, 19 V.S.A. § 2903, and 19 V.S.A. § 2904
respectively.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 23 of 39
Sec. 11. 19 V.S.A. § 2908 is added to read:
§ 2908. ALLOCATION OF APPROPRIATIONS
The Secretary, in the Secretary’s discretion, may allocate appropriated
funds among the programs established by this chapter.
* * * GWSA Amendments * * *
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 578 is amended to read:
§ 578. GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION REQUIREMENTS
(a) Greenhouse gas reduction requirements. Vermont shall reduce achieve
net zero emissions of greenhouse gases from within the geographical
boundaries of the State and those emissions outside the boundaries of the State
that are caused by the use of energy in Vermont, as measured and inventoried
pursuant to section 582 of this title, by: on or before January 1, 2035.
(1) not less than 26 percent from 2005 greenhouse gas emissions by
January 1, 2025 pursuant to the State’s membership in the United States
Climate Alliance and commitment to implement policies to achieve the
objectives of the 2016 Paris Agreement;
(2) not less than 40 percent from 1990 greenhouse gas emissions by
January 1, 2030 pursuant to the State’s 2016 Comprehensive Energy Plan; and
(3) not less than 80 percent from 1990 greenhouse gas emissions by
January 1, 2050 pursuant to the State’s 2016 Comprehensive Energy Plan
Vermont shall continue to implement the policies to achieve the objectives of
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 24 of 39
the 2016 Paris Agreement and remain at net zero greenhouse gas emissions
across all sectors into the future.
* * *
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 590 is amended to read:
§ 590. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Adaptation” means reducing vulnerability and advancing resilience
through planned and implemented enhancements to, or avoiding degradation
of, natural and built systems and structures.
(2) “Greenhouse gas” has the same meaning as in section 552 of this
title.
(3) “Mitigation” means reduction of anthropogenic greenhouse gas
emissions, and preservation and enhancement of natural systems to sequester
and store carbon, in order to stabilize and reduce greenhouse gases in the
atmosphere.
(4) “Net zero greenhouse gas emissions” means the total amount of
greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere after accounting for the amount
of greenhouse gases that are naturally absorbed or sequestered is at or less than
zero across all sectors.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 25 of 39
(5) “Resilience” means the capacity of individuals, communities, and
natural and built systems to withstand and recover from climatic events, trends,
and disruptions.
Sec. 14. 10 V.S.A. § 591 is amended to read:
§ 591. VERMONT CLIMATE COUNCIL
(a) There is created the Vermont Climate Council (Council). The Council
shall be advisory and composed of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Administration Natural Resources or designee, who
shall serve as the Chair of the Council;
(2) the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee State Climatologist
or designee;
(3) the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee;
(4) the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or
designee;
(5) the Secretary of Human Services or designee;
(6) the Secretary of Transportation or designee;
(7) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;
(8) the Commissioner of Public Service or designee;
(9) one member to represent municipal governments, appointed by the
Governor;
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 26 of 39
(10) one member to represent the rural communities, appointed by the
Governor;
(11) the following members who shall be appointed by the Speaker of
the House General Assembly:
(A) one member with expertise and professional experience in the
design and implementation of programs to reduce greenhouse gas emissions;
(B) one member to represent rural communities;
(C) one member to represent municipal governments;
(D) one member to represent distribution utilities;
(E)(B) one member to represent a statewide environmental
organization;
(F)(C) one member to represent the fuel sector;
(G) one member with expertise in climate change science; and
(H)(D) one member to represent Vermont manufacturers.
(10) the following members who shall be appointed by the Committee on
Committees:
(A) one member with expertise in the design and implementation of
programs to increase resilience to and respond to natural disasters resulting
from climate change;
(B)(E) one member to represent the clean energy sector;
(C)(F) one member to represent the small business community;
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 27 of 39
(D)(G) one member to represent the Vermont Community Action
Partnership;
(E)(H) one member to represent the farm and forest sector; and
(F)(I) one youth member; and
(G) one member of a Vermont-based organization with expertise in
energy and data analysis.
(b) The Council shall make recommendations to the Secretary of Natural
Resources and in formulating the recommendations the Council shall:
(1) Identify, analyze, and evaluate strategies and programs to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions; achieve the State’s reduction requirements pursuant
to section 578 of this title; and build resilience to prepare the State’s
communities, infrastructure, and economy to adapt to the current and
anticipated effects of climate change, including:.
(A) creating an inventory of all existing programs that impact
greenhouse gas emissions and their efficacy;
(B) evaluating and analyzing the technical feasibility and cost-
effectiveness of existing strategies and programs and identifying, evaluating,
and analyzing new strategies and programs that are based upon emerging
scientific and technical information;
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 28 of 39
(C) analyzing each source or category of sources of greenhouse gas
emissions and identifying which strategies and programs will result in the
largest greenhouse gas emissions reductions in the most cost-effective manner;
(D) identifying, analyzing, and evaluating public and private
financing strategies to support the transition to a reduced greenhouse gas
emissions economy and a more resilient State; and
(E) evaluating and analyzing existing strategies and programs that
build resilience, and identifying, evaluating, and analyzing new strategies and
programs to prepare the State’s communities, infrastructure, and economy to
adapt to the current and anticipated effects of climate change.
(2) On or before December 1, 2021, adopt Adopt the Vermont Climate
Action Plan (Plan) and update the Plan on or before July 1 every four years
thereafter, the first of which was adopted on December 1, 2021. On or before
December 15, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources, in collaboration with
the Department of Public Service and other relevant agencies and departments
of State government, shall deliver a companion implementation strategy and
aggressive-yet-achievable timeline for achieving net zero emissions across all
sectors by 2035. The companion implementation strategy shall include long-
term funding mechanisms that prioritizes use of existing resources. On or
before July 1 every five years thereafter, the Secretary of Natural Resources
shall consider the recommendations of the Council and shall update the Plan.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 29 of 39
The Council shall finalize its recommendations on or before January 1 of the
year that the Plan is due. The Plan shall set forth recommend the specific
affordable and practicable initiatives, programs, and strategies that the State
shall pursue will consider implementing to reduce greenhouse gas meet net
zero emissions reductions; achieve the State’s 2035 reduction requirements
target pursuant to section 578 of this title; and build resilience to prepare the
State’s communities, infrastructure, and economy to adapt to the current and
anticipated effects of climate change.
(3) Identify the means to accurately measure:
(A) the State’s greenhouse gas emissions and progress towards
meeting the reduction requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title,
including publishing emissions data in a timely manner;
(B) the effectiveness of the specific initiatives, programs, and
strategies set forth in the Plan and updates to the Plan in reducing greenhouse
gas emissions;
(C) the effect of climate change on the State’s climate, wildlife, and
natural resources; and
(D) the existing resilience of the State’s communities, infrastructure,
and economy and progress towards improving resilience to adapt to the current
and anticipated effects of climate change.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 30 of 39
(4) Provide guidance to the Secretary of Natural Resources concerning
the form, content, and subject matter of rules to be adopted recommended for
adoption pursuant to section 593 of this chapter.
(c) The Council shall create the subcommittees listed in this subsection and
may also create other subcommittees to advise the Council, and assist in
preparing the Plan, and carry out other duties. The Council may appoint
members of the Council to serve as members of subcommittees and may also
appoint individuals who are not members of the Council to serve as members
of subcommittees.
* * *
(3) Just Transitions Subcommittee. This subcommittee shall focus on
ensuring that strategies to reduce net greenhouse gas emissions and to build
resilience to adapt to the effects of climate change benefit and support all
residents of the State fairly and equitably. This subcommittee shall ensure that
strategies consider the disproportionate impact of climate change on rural, low-
income, and marginalized communities and that programs and incentives for
building resilience are designed to be accessible to all Vermonters and do not
unfairly burden any groups, communities, geographic locations, or economic
sectors. This subcommittee may adopt a measurement tool to assess the
equitability of programs and strategies considered by the Council.
* * *
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 31 of 39
(d) The Council shall recommend necessary legislation to the General
Assembly concerning:
(1) adopting market-based or alternative compliance mechanisms as part
of the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction strategies;
(2) changes to land use and development, including to chapter 151 of this
title and 30 V.S.A. § 248, to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and promote
resilience in response to climate change;
(3) statutory authority necessary to implement the Plan; and
(4) any other matter the Council deems appropriate.
(e) The Council shall have the administrative, and technical, and legal
assistance of the Agency of Natural Resources and the Department of Public
Service and may request the assistance of any Executive Branch Agency
agency and Department department.
(f)(e) A majority of the sitting members of the Council shall constitute a
quorum, and action taken by the Council may be authorized by a majority of
the members present and voting at any meeting at which a quorum is present.
The Council may permit any or all members to participate in a meeting by, or
conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication,
including electronic, telecommunications, and video- or audio-conferencing
technology, by which all members participating may simultaneously or
sequentially communicate with each other during the meeting. A member
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 32 of 39
participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at
the meeting. The Council shall meet at the call of the Chair or a majority of
the members of the Council, and the Council may elect officers and adopt any
other procedural rules as it shall determine necessary and appropriate to
perform its work.
(g)(f) Members of the Council and members of subcommittees who are not
State employees shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement
of expenses for each day spent in the performance of their duties, as permitted
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the Agency of Natural Resources.
(h)(g) The members of the Council appointed pursuant to subdivision (a)
(9)(11) of this section shall be appointed to initial terms of two years, and
members appointed pursuant to subdivision (a)(10) of this section shall be
appointed to initial terms of three years. Thereafter, each appointed member
shall serve a term of three years or until his or her a member’s earlier
resignation or removal. A vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority
for the remainder of the unexpired term. An appointed member shall not serve
more than three two full consecutive three-year terms.
(i)(h) On or before January 15, 2021 and every January 15 thereafter, the
Council shall submit a written report to the General Assembly concerning the
Council’s activities and the State’s progress towards meeting the 2035 net
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 33 of 39
greenhouse gas reduction requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title. On
or before November 1, 2021 and every second November 1 thereafter, the
Director of Vermont Emergency Management shall file a report with the
Council concerning Vermont’s overall municipal resilience to increased
hazards presented by climate change that shall include hazard mitigation plans,
local emergency management plans, and survey results as deemed appropriate
by the Director. Subsequent reports shall include updates to document
progress in local resilience. The report shall inform Council recommendations
on policies to address gaps in local resilience.
Sec. 15. 10 V.S.A. § 592 is amended to read:
§ 592. THE VERMONT CLIMATE ACTION PLAN
(a) On or before December 1, 2021, the Vermont Climate Council
(Council) shall adopt adopted the Vermont Climate Action Plan (Plan) and.
The Secretary of Natural Resources shall update the Plan on or before July 1
every four five years thereafter.
(b) The Plan shall set forth recommend the specific affordable and
practicable initiatives, programs, and strategies, including regulatory and
legislative changes, necessary to achieve the State’s net zero greenhouse gas
emissions reduction requirements across all sectors pursuant to section 578 of
this title and build resilience to prepare the State’s communities, infrastructure,
and economy to adapt to the current and anticipated effects of climate change.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 34 of 39
The Plan shall include those specific affordable and practicable initiatives,
programs, and strategies that will:
* * *
(c) The analysis, development, and selection of the specific initiatives,
programs, and strategies contained in the Plan and updates to the Plan shall be
based upon:
(1) the Council’s analysis and evaluation of strategies and programs
pursuant to subdivision 591(b)(1) of this chapter;
(2) reports, plans, and information pertaining to greenhouse gas
emissions reduction and climate resilience strategies from the Agency of
Natural Resources, the Department of Public Service, other State agencies and
departments, and, where appropriate, the State Comprehensive Energy Plan
prepared pursuant to 30 V.S.A. § 202b and the 2018 Vermont Climate Action
Commission Report to the Governor; and
(3) other reports, plans, and information.
(d) The specific initiatives, programs, and strategies contained in To the
extent practicable and affordable, the Plan and updates to the Plan shall further
the following objectives:
(1) to prioritize the most cost-effective, technologically feasible, and
equitable greenhouse gas emissions reduction pathways and adaptation and
preparedness strategies informed by scientific and technical expertise;
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 35 of 39
(2) to provide for net zero greenhouse gas emissions reductions that
reflect the relative contribution of each source or category of source of
emissions;
* * *
(e) The Plan updated Plans shall form the basis for the recommend rules
adopted for consideration by the Secretary of Natural Resources pursuant to
section 593 of this chapter. If the Council fails to adopt the Plan or update the
Plan as required by this chapter, the The Secretary shall proceed with adopting
and implementing rules pursuant to subsection 593(j) of this chapter that, in the
Secretary’s discretion, are cost effective, practicable, and designed to achieve
the net zero greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements pursuant to
section 578 of this title.
Sec. 16. 10 V.S.A. § 593 is amended to read:
§ 593. RULES
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall consider and adopt rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, which are, in the Secretary’s discretion, cost
effective, affordable, practicable, and designed to achieve the net zero
greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements pursuant to section 578 of
this title and are consistent with the Vermont Climate Action Plan (Plan). In
adopting rules pursuant to this section, the Secretary shall:
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 36 of 39
(1) Ensure that Consider whether the rules are consistent with the
specific initiatives, programs, and strategies set forth in the Plan and updates to
the Plan; follow consider the Vermont Climate Council’s guidance provided
pursuant to subdivision 591(b)(4) of this chapter; and further the objectives
pursuant to subsection 592(d) of this chapter.
(2) Develop a detailed record containing facts; data; and legal, scientific,
and technical information sufficient to establish a reasonable basis to believe
that the rules shall achieve the State’s net zero greenhouse gas emissions
reductions requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title. This detailed
record shall be included with the rule and filed with the Secretary of State
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 838.
* * *
(e) On or before July 1, 2026 2027, the Secretary shall consider and adopt
and implement rules, which are, in the Secretary’s discretion, cost effective,
affordable, practicable, and designed to achieve the 2035 net greenhouse gas
emissions reductions requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title and are
consistent with the specific initiatives, programs, and strategies set forth in the
Plan and updates to the Plan and achieve the 2030 2035 net zero greenhouse
gas emissions reduction across all sectors requirement pursuant to section 578
of this title. The Secretary shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of
this section.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 37 of 39
(f) The Secretary shall, at his or her discretion, but not less frequently than
once every two years between 2026 and 2030, review and, if necessary, update
the rules required by subsection (e) of this section in order to ensure that the
2030 greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirement pursuant to section 578
of this title is achieved. In performing this review and update, the Secretary
shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(g) On or before July 1, 2040, the Secretary shall consider and adopt and
implement rules, which are, in the Secretary’s discretion, cost effective,
affordable, practicable, and designed to maintain the net zero or less
greenhouse gas emissions and are consistent with the specific initiatives,
programs, and strategies set forth in the Plan and updates to the Plan and
achieve the 2050 net zero greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirement
pursuant to section 578 of this title across all sectors.
(h) The Secretary shall, at his or her discretion, but not less frequently than
once every two years between 2040 and 2050, review and, if necessary, update
the rules required by subsection (g) of this section in order to ensure that the
2050 greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirement pursuant to section 578
of this title is achieved. In performing this review and update, the Secretary
shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 38 of 39
(i)(g) The Secretary may establish alternative reduction mechanisms to be
used by sources of greenhouse gas emissions, if necessary, to achieve net zero
emissions after 2050 on or before 2035.
(1) The use of alternative reduction mechanisms shall account for not
more than 20 percent of statewide greenhouse gas emissions estimated as a
percentage of 1990 emissions. The use of a mechanism must offset a quantity
of greenhouse gas emissions equal to or greater than the amount of greenhouse
gasses emitted.
(2) The Secretary shall verify that any greenhouse gas emissions offset
projects authorized as alternative reduction mechanisms represent equivalent
emissions reductions or carbon sequestration that are real, additional,
verifiable, enforceable, and permanent.
(j) If the Council fails to adopt the Plan or update the Plan as required by
section 592 of this chapter, the Secretary shall adopt and implement rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions
reductions requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title.
(k)(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the existing
authority of a State agency, department, or entity to regulate greenhouse gas
emissions or establish strategies or adopt rules to mitigate climate risk and
build resilience to climate change.
VT LEG #380465 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.289
2025 Page 39 of 39
(l) The General Assembly may repeal, revise, or modify any rule or
amendment to any rule, and its action shall not be abridged, enlarged, or
modified by subsequent rule.
Sec. 17. REPEAL
10 V.S.A. § 594 is repealed.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 18. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380465 v.2